Utah statutes.
78B-1-134.   Witnesses -- Duty to answer questions -- Privilege.

(1)  A witness shall answer all questions legal and pertinent to the matter in issue, although an answer may establish a claim against the witness.

(2)  A witness need not give an answer which will subject him to punishment for a felony.

(3)  A witness need not give an answer which will degrade his character, unless it is to the very fact in issue or to a fact from which the fact in issue would be presumed.

(4)  A witness must answer as to the fact of any previous conviction of a felony.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

